Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB811.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 211.160 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The secretary for health and family services may, from the funds available, employ,
by contract or otherwise such medical, clinical, technical, and other personnel that
he or she deems necessary to effectuate the purposes of KRS 211.130 to 211.160,
and fix and pay their compensation and necessary traveling expenses.
(2) The secretary for health and family services may, from the funds available, procure,
by purchase or lease or otherwise, such property, equipment, services, facilities, and
supplies that he or she deems necessary to effectuate the purposes of KRS 211.130
to 211.160.
(3) The secretary for health and family services is authorized to accept, on behalf of the
Commonwealth of Kentucky, all gifts, donations, contributions, grants, devises,
bequests, and conveyances of real and personal property for establishing, providing,
and maintaining the services and facilities described in KRS 211.150, subject only
to the condition that same shall be devoted to and used for said purposes. All funds
received by the secretary for health and family services shall be deposited in the
State Treasury and credited to a trust and agency fund account and expended only
for purposes authorized by KRS 211.130 to 211.160.
(4) The secretary for health and family services may make and issue all necessary rules
and regulations to carry out KRS 211.130 to 211.160; provided, however, that no
educable person shall be eligible for any benefits hereunder unless he or she is, and
has been continuously for at least twelve (12) months immediately preceding the
date of his or her application therefor, an actual resident of this state.
(5) The secretary for health and family services may delegate to any division of the
cabinet, or to any director thereof, any and all of his or her authority and duties
hereunder.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/27/2026 3:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2439
(6) Upon request of the secretary for health and family services, approved in writing by
the Governor, any cabinet, agency, or commission of the Commonwealth shall
furnish without cost to the cabinet such services, facilities, and assistance as are
available and, in the judgment of the secretary for health and family services and
the Governor, required, to effectuate the purposes of KRS 211.130 to 211.160 or its
administration which is hereby vested in the cabinet.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/27/2026 3:31 PM Jacketed